District of Columbia statutes.
44-1639

Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Jan. 23, 2008, D.C. Law 17-69, § 10, 54 DCR 11650
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 10 of the Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act of 2007.